Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-328
Public buildings; works of art; property of State of Nebraska; sale of reproductions.

All works of art acquired under sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03 shall become the property of the State of Nebraska. The artist shall retain no ownership, control, or authority of any kind over the work of art or its future disposition. In the event the state makes a net profit through the sale of reproductions of the work of art it may pay a portion of that profit to the artist.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 20.